Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Article 1. In General

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

20 Am. Jur. 2d Courts § 1 et seq.; 46 Am. Jur. 2d Judges § 1 et seq.

21 C.J.S. Courts §§ 111 to 123.

§ 5-2-101.
Regular terms.

There shall be held at
the capital of the state two (2) regular terms of the supreme court
in each year, one (1) commencing on the first Monday of April, and
one (1) commencing on the first Monday of October.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 49, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 3280; Laws 1905, ch. 4, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 875; C.S. 1920, § 1104; R.S. 1931, § 31-101; C.S. 1945, § 1-101; W.S. 1957, § 5-5.

Cross references. —

As to terms of supreme court, see art. 5, § 7, Wyo. Const.

As to power of court to fix terms in absence of legislation, see art. 5, § 26, Wyo. Const.

§ 5-2-102.
Number of justices; chief justice; head of judicial system.

The supreme court of
Wyoming shall consist of five (5) justices. The justices shall choose
one (1) of their number to serve as chief justice, who shall serve
at the pleasure of a majority of the court. The supreme court is the
head of the state judicial system, and the chief justice is the chief
administrator of the duties prescribed by law to be performed by the
court.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 5-5.1.

Applied

in

Goodman v. State, 644 P.2d 1240,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 339

(Wyo. 1982).

§ 5-2-103.
Special terms.

In addition to the regular
terms of the supreme court, as fixed by law, special terms of said
court may be held for the transaction of all business, when ordered
by a majority of the justices of said court.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 28, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 3281; C.S. 1910, § 876; C.S. 1920, § 1105; R.S. 1931, § 31-102; C.S. 1945, § 1-102; W.S. 1957, § 5-6.

§ 5-2-104.
One day notice of special term; order.

A special term of the
supreme court shall be called upon not less than one (1) day’s notice
by an order directed to the clerk thereof, signed by the justices
of the court ordering said special term, and specifying the time and
place of holding the same; and upon the receipt of said order, the
clerk of said court shall immediately notify the bailiff and all officials
of said court, and such members of the court as shall not have signed
the order, of the contents of such order, and such order shall be
spread at large upon the journal of the court on the record of the
proceedings of the first day of said special term.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 28, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 3282; C.S. 1910, § 877; C.S. 1920, § 1106; R.S. 1931, § 31-103; C.S. 1945, § 1-103; W.S. 1957, § 5-7.

§ 5-2-105.
Transaction of business at special term; not to interfere with regular
term.

At any special term of
the supreme court it shall be lawful to transact all business that
can be transacted by the court at a regular term thereof, but no cause,
action or proceeding shall be heard at such special term without the
consent of the parties thereto, unless the matter presented be an
ex parte application, that may be granted without notice to the adverse
party. The ordering or holding of a special term of said court shall
in no wise interfere with any regular term or adjourned regular term
thereof.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 28, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 3283; C.S. 1910, § 878; C.S. 1920, § 1107; R.S. 1931, § 31-104; C.S. 1945, § 1-104; W.S. 1957, § 5-8.

§ 5-2-106.
Quorum.

A majority of the justices
of the supreme court shall be necessary to constitute a quorum for
the transaction of business. If there shall not be a quorum of the
justices present on the first day of any adjourned or regular term
of the supreme court, the court shall stand adjourned from day to
day, until a quorum shall be present, and the said court may, there
being a quorum present, adjourn from time to time to any date deemed
proper.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 49, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 3285; C.S. 1910, § 879; C.S. 1920, § 1108; R.S. 1931, § 31-105; C.S. 1945, § 1-105; W.S. 1957, § 5-9.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision as to quorum, see art. 5, § 4, Wyo. Const.

A judge of the district court called to hear a cause

in the supreme court is a justice of that court for that cause, as though he had been a regularly elected justice of said court. Phelan v. Cheyenne Brick Co., 26 Wyo. 493, 188 P. 354,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 26 Wyo. 493, 189 P. 1103,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1920).

Law reviews. —

For article, Tyler J. Garrett, Anatomy of a Wyoming Appeal: A Practitioner's Guide for Civil Cases, see 16 Wyo. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

§ 5-2-107.
Causes may be matured to adjourned terms.

It shall be lawful to
mature causes to any adjourned term or terms of the supreme court,
the same as to the beginning of any term of the supreme court, and
it shall be competent for the said court to hear and determine causes
at any such adjourned term or terms, the same as though heard and
determined at any regular term of the said court, and as though such
causes were on the calendar or docket at the commencement of any regular
term thereof.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 49, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 3285; C.S. 1910, § 880; C.S. 1920, § 1109; R.S. 1931, § 31-106; C.S. 1945, § 1-106; W.S. 1957, § 5-10.

§ 5-2-108.
Process.

All process issued out
of the supreme court, shall bear teste in the name of the chief justice
and shall be signed by the clerk of said court, sealed with its seal,
made returnable according to law, and the same shall be executed by
the officer or person to whom the same is directed.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 49, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 3287; C.S. 1910, § 882; C.S. 1920, § 1111; R.S. 1931, § 31-108; C.S. 1945, § 1-108; W.S. 1957, § 5-11.

Cross references. —

As to style of process, see art. 5, § 15, Wyo. Const.

As to process generally, see chapter 6 of title 1.

§ 5-2-109.
Undisposed proceedings to stand continued.

All matters, suits and
proceedings undisposed of at any term of the supreme court shall stand
continued to the next succeeding regular or adjourned term thereof.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 49, § 6; R.S. 1899, § 3288; C.S. 1910, § 883; C.S. 1920, § 1112; R.S. 1931, § 31-109; C.S. 1945, § 1-109; W.S. 1957, § 5-12.

§ 5-2-110.
Opinions to be in writing and filed; dissenting opinion.

The opinion of the justices
of the supreme court on any matter pending before it, shall be given
in writing and be filed with the papers in the case, and when the
justices thereof are divided in opinion in any case, the fact of such
division shall be stated in the opinion and the dissenting justice
may file his opinion.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 49, § 7; R.S. 1899, § 3289; C.S. 1910, § 884; C.S. 1920, § 1113; R.S. 1931, § 31-110; C.S. 1945, § 1-110; W.S. 1957, § 5-13.

Cross references. —

As to publication of decisions, see art. 4 of this chapter.

Applied

in

Hamburg v. Hansen, 683 P.2d 662,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 302

(Wyo. 1984).

Cited

in

Town of Lovell v. Menhall, 386 P.2d 109,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1963).

Law reviews. —

For article, Tyler J. Garrett, Anatomy of a Wyoming Appeal: A Practitioner's Guide for Civil Cases, see 16 Wyo. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

§ 5-2-111.
Seal.

The seal of the supreme
court shall be that of the state of Wyoming, substituting the words
“Supreme Court of the State of Wyoming” around the vignette of said
seal.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 49, § 8; R.S. 1899, § 3294; C.S. 1910, § 889; C.S. 1920, § 1118; R.S. 1931, § 31-114; C.S. 1945, § 1-111; W.S. 1957, § 5-14.

Cross references. —

As to great seal of state of Wyoming, see §

8-3-101

.

§ 5-2-112.
Justices not to practice law.

No justice of the supreme
court shall practice as an attorney in any of the courts of this state,
nor give advice touching any cause pending, or to be brought therein.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 106, § 10; R.S. 1887, § 833; R.S. 1899, § 3293; C.S. 1910, § 888; C.S. 1920, § 1117; R.S. 1931, § 31-113; C.S. 1945, § 1-112; W.S. 1957, § 5-15.

Cross references. —

For constitutional prohibition against practicing law, see art. 5, § 25, Wyo. Const.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and application of state statute prohibiting judge from practicing law, 17 ALR4th 829.

§ 5-2-113.
Rules of practice for supreme court; effect of rules.

It shall be the duty
of the supreme court, from time to time, to prescribe rules of practice
for said court, not inconsistent with the constitution or laws of
this state, and when said rules are adopted by said court, the same
shall be as binding upon the court, and the attorneys thereof, and
the parties having business therein as though the same were enactments
of the legislature of the state.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 106, § 4; R.S. 1887, § 826; Laws 1890-91, ch. 49, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 3286; C.S. 1910, § 881; C.S. 1920, § 1110; R.S. 1931, § 31-107; C.S. 1945, § 1-107; W.S. 1957, § 5-17.

Cross references. —

As to authority to make rules for disposition of constitutional questions reserved to supreme court, see §

1-13-102

.

For Rules of the Supreme Court of Wyoming, see the

Wyoming Court Rules Annotated.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1890-91, ch. 49, § 4, did not specifically amend C.L. 1876, ch. 106, § 4, and this section is actually a consolidation of the two sections, which first occurred in R.S. 1899.

Rules of the supreme court are binding

upon courts, parties and attorneys. Cronkhite v. Bothwell, 3 Wyo. 736, 30 P. 492,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo.), dismissed, 3 Wyo. 739, 31 P. 400,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1892); Robertson v. Shorow, 10 Wyo. 368, 69 P. 1,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1902); Phillips v. Brill, 15 Wyo. 521, 90 P. 443,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1907).

As though statutory enactments. —

A rule of the supreme court is binding upon the several courts and the parties practicing and having business therein as though the same were an enactment of the legislative authority, provided it is not inconsistent with the Organic Act and laws. Johns v. Adams Bros., 2 Wyo. 194,

1880 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1880); Perkins v. Hoyt, 3 Wyo. 55, 31 P. 1046,

1883 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1883).

Supreme court rule requiring petitions for rehearing to be filed within 30 days after the decision is rendered has the force of a statutory enactment, and petitions filed after the time specified are unavailing. Dean v. Omaha-Wyoming Oil Co., 21 Wyo. 133, 128 P. 881,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 21 Wyo. 133, 128 P. 881,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1913).

Rule not suspended for foreign attorney. —

A rule of the supreme court cannot be suspended merely because a foreign attorney whose duty it is to file briefs is unaware of the time and allows it to go over. Cronkhite v. Bothwell, 3 Wyo. 739, 31 P. 400,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1892).

Limits on court's power. —

The limits of the power of the supreme court to prescribe rules of practice to facilitate its business are as stated in this section, that the rules should not be inconsistent with the constitution or laws of the state. Harvey v. Stanolind Oil & Gas Co., 53 Wyo. 495, 84 P.2d 755,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1938), reh'g denied, 53 Wyo. 495, 84 P.2d 755,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1939).

Former rules held not to exceed limits. —

See Snider v. Rhodes, 53 Wyo. 157, 79 P.2d 481,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1938); Harvey v. Stanolind Oil & Gas Co., 53 Wyo. 495, 84 P.2d 755,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1938), reh'g denied, 53 Wyo. 495, 84 P.2d 755,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1939).

Cited

in

Wilson v. State, 655 P.2d 1246,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 407

(Wyo. 1982); In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water, 803 P.2d 61,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 1990); Bd. of Prof'l Responsibility v. Casper, 2014 WY 22,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Feb 19, 2014); Bd. of Prof'l Responsibility v. Casper, 2014 WY 22,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Feb 19, 2014); Bd. of Prof'l Responsibility v. Casper, 2014 WY 22, 2014 Wyo. LEXIS 27 (Feb 19, 2014).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Supreme Court Jurisdiction and the Wyoming Constitution: Justice v. Judicial Restraint,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 159 (1985).

§ 5-2-114.
Rules and forms governing pleading, practice and procedure in all
courts; power to adopt, modify and repeal.

The supreme court of
Wyoming may from time to time adopt, modify and repeal general rules
and forms governing pleading, practice and procedure, in all courts
of this state, for the purpose of promoting the speedy and efficient
determination of litigation upon its merits.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 53, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 5-18.

Cross references. —

As to power of supreme court to make rules governing admission of attorneys to the bar, see §

33-5-102

.

Rules to encourage prompt determination of litigation. —

The legislature with this section recognized one of the purposes of the rules of this court to be the prompt determination of litigation. Mott v. England, 604 P.2d 560,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 506

(Wyo. 1979).

Section not a delegation of power. —

This section only supplements art. 5, § 2, Wyo. Const., and does not constitute a delegation of rule-making authority from the legislature. White v. Fisher, 689 P.2d 102,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 341

(Wyo. 1984).

Rule-making power of supreme court is restricted by statute

and cannot by rule in any way change substantive rights or enlarge the jurisdiction of any court. McGuire v. McGuire, 608 P.2d 1278,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 251

(Wyo. 1980).

Civil and criminal rules applicable to justice of the peace and municipal courts

were adopted in accordance with this section and the plenary power of the supreme court. Petersen v. State, 594 P.2d 978,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 411

(Wyo. 1979).

Procedure for handling appeals from a justice of the peace
court. —

See State v. Heberling, 553 P.2d 1043,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 211

(Wyo. 1976).

Applied

in

State ex rel. George v. Hull, 65 Wyo. 251, 199 P.2d 832,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1948); Goodman v. State, 644 P.2d 1240,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 339

(Wyo. 1982); Hopkinson v. State, 664 P.2d 43,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1983); State v. District Court, 715 P.2d 191,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 501

(Wyo. 1986); Munroe v. Kautz, 833 F. Supp. 854, 1993 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13660 (D. Wyo. 1993); Winders v. United Transp. Union, 833 F. Supp. 860, 1993 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14157 (D. Wyo. 1993).

Quoted

in

Lapp v. City of Worland, 612 P.2d 868,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1980); Ryan v. State, 988 P.2d 46,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1999); Busch v. Horton Automatics, Inc., 2008 WY 140, 196 P.3d 787,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Nov. 25, 2008).

Stated in

Bd. of Prof'l Responsibility v. Richard, 2014 WY 98,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 114

, 2014 WL 3778285 (Aug 1, 2014).

Cited

in

Elliott v. State, 626 P.2d 1044,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 326

(Wyo. 1981); Olson v. Campbell County Mem. Hosp., 652 P.2d 1365,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 395

(Wyo. 1982); Wilson v. State, 655 P.2d 1246,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 407

(Wyo. 1982); Brenner v. City of Casper, 723 P.2d 558,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 594

(Wyo. 1986); Jackson v. State, 891 P.2d 70,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1995); Doney v. State, 2002 WY 182, 59 P.3d 730,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 219

(Wyo. 2002); Bd. of Prof'l Responsibility v. Stinson, 2014 WY 134,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Oct. 29, 2014).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Criminal Procedure — The Elimination of Dismissals for Lack of Prosecution from Wyoming Intermediate Appeals. Wood v. City of Casper, 660 P.2d 1163,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 302

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 301 (1984).

For comment, “Disqualification of District Judges in Wyoming: An Assessment of the Revised Rules,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 655 (1984).

For article, “Supreme Court Jurisdiction and the Wyoming Constitution: Justice v. Judicial Restraint,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 159 (1985).

For case note, “Criminal Procedure — When Should a Jury Trial Be Required in the Wyoming Municipal Courts? City of Casper v. Cheatham, 739 P.2d 1222,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1987),” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 611 (1990).

§ 5-2-115.
Rules and forms governing pleading, practice and procedure in all
courts; application of rules.

Such rules may govern:

The forms of process, writs, pleadings and motions and the subjects of parties, depositions, discovery, trials, evidence, judgments, new trials, provisional and final remedies and all other matters of pleading, practice and procedure; and

Any review of or other supervisory proceedings from the judgment or decision of any court, board, officer, or commission when such review is authorized by law.

Such rules shall neither abridge, enlarge nor modify the substantive rights of any person nor the jurisdiction of any of the courts nor change the provisions of any statute of limitations.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 53, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 5-19.

Rule-making power of supreme court is restricted by statute

and the court cannot by rule in any way change substantive rights or enlarge the jurisdiction of any court. McGuire v. McGuire, 608 P.2d 1278,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 251

(Wyo. 1980).

Supreme court cannot supersede statutory jury-trial right through exercise of rule-making power.

See Goodman v. State, 644 P.2d 1240,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 339

(Wyo. 1982).

Therefore, defendant is entitled to jury trial in justice court under §

7-6-112

for a violation of a statute defining a misdemeanor, even though no jail sentence is provided for by the statute, as allegedly required by Rule 5, W.R.Cr.P. Goodman v. State, 644 P.2d 1240,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 339

(Wyo. 1982).

Pleadings as a procedural matter. —

The prescription of the form and content of pleadings which are to be filed in Wyoming courts is a procedural, not a substantive, matter. White v. Fisher, 689 P.2d 102,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 341

(Wyo. 1984).

Guidelines of Rule 6(a), W.R.C.P., applicable to §

1-3-107

. —

Subsection (b) does not express a legislative intent that precludes the application of Rule 6(a), W.R.C.P., containing guidelines for the computation of time within the court rules, to the time periods found in §

1-3-107

, a statute of limitation. Olson v. Campbell County Memorial Hosp., 652 P.2d 1365,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 395

(Wyo. 1982).

Procedure for handling appeals from a justice of the peace
court. —

See State v. Heberling, 553 P.2d 1043,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 211

(Wyo. 1976).

Applied

in

Bernard v. State, 652 P.2d 982,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 397

(Wyo. 1982); Hopkinson v. State, 664 P.2d 43,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1983); State v. District Court, 715 P.2d 191,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 501

(Wyo. 1986).

Quoted

in

Ryan v. State, 988 P.2d 46,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1999); Busch v. Horton Automatics, Inc., 2008 WY 140, 196 P.3d 787,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Nov. 25, 2008).

Stated

in

State ex rel. Frederick v. District Court, 399 P.2d 583,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 123

, 12 ALR3d 1 (Wyo. 1965).

Cited

in

Doney v. State, 2002 WY 182, 59 P.3d 730,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 219

(Wyo. 2002);Hoke v. Motel
6 Jackson & Accor N. Am., Inc., 2006 WY 38, 131 P.3d 369,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. Mar. 27, 2006).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Supreme Court Jurisdiction and the Wyoming Constitution: Justice v. Judicial Restraint,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 159 (1985).

For case note, “Criminal Procedure — Wyoming Recognizes a Substantive Right to Bail Pending Appeal of Conviction. State v. District Court, 715 P.2d 191,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 501

(Wyo. 1986),” see XXII Land & Water L. Rev. 605 (1987).

For case note, “Criminal Procedure — When Should a Jury Trial Be Required in the Wyoming Municipal Courts? City of Casper v. Cheatham, 739 P.2d 1222,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1987),” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 611 (1990).

§ 5-2-116.
Rules and forms governing pleading, practice and procedure in all
courts; rules to be entered in proceedings; effective date; notice.

Upon the adoption of
any rule or form the supreme court shall enter it in its proceedings
and shall fix the date upon which such rule or form shall become effective
but such effective date shall be at least sixty (60) days after notice
thereof has been published by the supreme court in such publication
as it may designate. From and after the effective date of any such
rule or form all laws in conflict therewith shall be of no further
force or effect.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 53, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 5-20.

Rule of supreme court has force and effect of law.

See Barnes v. State, 642 P.2d 1263,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 343

(Wyo. 1982).

Quoted

in

Lapp v. City of Worland, 612 P.2d 868,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1980); Elliott v. State, 626 P.2d 1044,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 326

(Wyo. 1981).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Frederick v. District Court, 399 P.2d 583,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 123

, 12 ALR3d 1 (Wyo. 1965).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Supreme Court Jurisdiction and the Wyoming Constitution: Justice v. Judicial Restraint,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 159 (1985).

§ 5-2-117.
Rules and forms governing pleading, practice and procedure in all
courts; appointment and duties of advisory committee.

The supreme court shall
appoint an advisory committee to make recommendations from time to
time with respect to pleading, practice and procedure. Such committee
shall hold hearings upon proposed rules in such manner and upon such
notice as the supreme court prescribes and report to the court from
time to time such recommendations as it deems proper.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 53, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 5-21.

Cited

in

Hopkinson v. State, 664 P.2d 43,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1983).

§ 5-2-118.
Adoption of rules and regulations relative to the practice of law.

The supreme court of Wyoming shall, from time to time, adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as the court may see proper:

Prescribing a code of ethics governing the professional conduct of attorneys at law;

Organizing and governing a bar association of the attorneys at law of this state to act as an administrative agency of the supreme court of Wyoming for the purpose of enforcing such rules and regulations as are prescribed, adopted, and promulgated by the supreme court under this act [section], providing for the government of the state bar as a part of the judicial department of the state government and for such divisions thereof as the supreme court shall determine, and requiring all persons practicing law in this state to be members thereof in good standing, and fixing the form of its organization and operation;

Establishing practice and procedure for disciplining, suspending, and disbarring attorneys at law, including suspending attorneys for failure to pay child support as specified in W.S.

20-6-112

.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 97, §§ 1, 2; C.S. 1945, § 2-401; W.S. 1957, § 5-22; Laws 1965, ch. 166, § 1; 1973, ch. 188, § 2; 1997, ch. 128, § 2.

Cross references. —

For duty of supreme court to prescribe rules to secure a system of uniform examination for admission to the bar, see §

33-5-102

.

For Rules for Organization and Government of Bar Association, Rules of Professional Conduct for Attorneys at Law, and Disciplinary Code for the Wyoming State Bar, see the

Wyoming Court Rules Annotated.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 2, ch. 97, Laws 1939, reads: “When and as the rules of court herein authorized shall be prescribed, adopted, and promulgated, all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith shall be and become of no further force or effect to the extent of such conflict.”

Supreme court's responsibility. —

Inherent to the supreme court's responsibility under this section is the requirement that the court establish ethical standards as well as effective practices and procedures for disciplining, suspending and disbarring attorneys in the event those standards are violated. Meyer v. Norman, 780 P.2d 283,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1989).

Suspension. —

In disciplinary proceedings, the Supreme Court of Wyoming suspended an attorney because he knowingly violated Wyo. R. Prof. Conduct 3.4(c) while prosecuting a criminal assault case by failing to comply with the district court’s discovery order directing him to promptly request the complainant’s records from Facebook and a cell phone company. The attorney admitted he violated Wyo. R. Prof. Conduct 1.3, 3.2, and 8.4(d) by failing to respond to defendant’s motion to restrict testimony, failing to seek production of records as ordered by the court, and engaging in conduct prejudicial to the administration of justice; the court considered mitigating factors, as he displayed remorse and was cooperative during the disciplinary proceeding. Bd. of Prof'l Resp. v. Hinckley, 2022 WY 18, 503 P.3d 584,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 2022).

Stated

in

Munroe v. Kautz, 833 F. Supp. 854, 1993 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13660 (D. Wyo. 1993); Winders v. United Transp. Union, 833 F. Supp. 860, 1993 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14157 (D. Wyo. 1993); Bd. of Prof'l Responsibility v. Richard, 2014 WY 98,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 114

, 2014 WL 3778285 (Aug 1, 2014).

Cited

in

Dawson v. City of Casper, 731 P.2d 1186,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 389

(Wyo. 1987); Bd. of Prof'l Responsibility v. Casper, 2014 WY 22,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Feb 19, 2014); Bd. of Prof'l Responsibility v. Stinson, 2014 WY 134,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Oct. 29, 2014); Bd. of Prof'l Responsibility v. Casper, 2014 WY 22,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Feb 19, 2014); Bd. of Prof'l Responsibility v. Casper, 2014 WY 22, 2014 Wyo. LEXIS 27 (Feb 19, 2014); Bd. of Prof'l Responsibility v. Custis, 2015 WY 59,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Apr. 16, 2015).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Supreme Court Jurisdiction and the Wyoming Constitution: Justice v. Judicial Restraint,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 159 (1985).

§ 5-2-119.
Appeals
from courts of limited jurisdiction.

Notwithstanding any other
provision of law, any case in which original jurisdiction is in a
municipal court or a circuit court may be appealed to the district
courts and thereafter to the Wyoming supreme court only if the supreme
court grants a writ of certiorari agreeing to hear the appeal. The
Wyoming supreme court shall adopt procedures under which the court
will grant or deny appeals to the court in such cases and provide
the standards and extent of review.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 132, § 1; 2000, ch. 24, § 2; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

deleted “a justice of the peace court” following “is in a municipal court.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Appeal from small-claims court to district court. —

Actions for small claims are no different, other than the informal procedure, from any other civil actions triable in county courts or justice of the peace courts, and it follows that appellate jurisdiction is assigned to the district court within the same county. Johnson v. Statewide Collections, 778 P.2d 93,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 1989).

Quoted

in

Kittles v. Rocky Mt. Recovery, Inc., 1 P.3d 1220,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 2000).

Cited

in

Stogner v. State, 792 P.2d 1358,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1990); Saunders v. Hornecker, 2015 WY 34,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Mar. 5, 2015); Elec. Wholesale Supply Co. v. Fraser, 2015 WY 105,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Aug. 14, 2015); Best v. Best, 2015 WY 133,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Sept. 30, 2015).

§ 5-2-120.
Judicial systems automation account created; purposes; court information technology equipment.

There is created an account entitled the “judicial systems automation account.” No funds shall be expended from the account unless and until the legislature appropriates the funds. Funds within the account shall be used by the supreme court for the purchase, maintenance and operation of computer hardware, including court information technology equipment, and software to enhance the communication, records and management needs of the courts of the judicial branch of the state of Wyoming. Interest accruing to this account shall be retained therein and shall be expended for the purposes provided in this section, as appropriated by the legislature. Annually, the supreme court shall develop a plan for all trial and appellate courts within the state for the expenditure of funds from the account. Prior to implementation, the plan shall be annually submitted to the joint appropriations interim committee and joint judiciary interim committee for review and comment.

Implementation of court information technology equipment that requires alteration of a county building pursuant to W.S. 18-2-103(b) shall be accomplished in consultation with the board of county commissioners or the board’s appointed designee.

The supreme court shall install court information technology equipment in all state court facilities in a phased approach. Upon installation of court information technology equipment in a state court facility, the supreme court shall maintain and support the equipment installed by the supreme court.

As used in this section:

“Court information technology equipment” means hardware equipment located in state court facilities necessary to meet, but not exceed, court information technology equipment standards adopted by the board of judicial policy and administration;

“State court facility” includes circuit, chancery and district courtrooms, circuit and district court jury rooms, circuit, chancery and district court judges’ chambers and the offices of circuit and chancery court clerks.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 25, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 1; 2018 ch. 18, § 1, effective March 9, 2018; 2019 ch. 200, § 2, effective March 15, 2019.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the special revenue fund” in the first sentence.

The 2008 amendment

inserted “joint appropriations interim committee and” in the final sentence.

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

The 2018 amendment,

in (a), inserted “including court information technology equipment” in the third sentence; added (b) through (d); and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2018, ch. 18, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2018.

The 2019 amendment,

in (d)(ii), substituted “circuit, chancery and district” for “circuit and district” throughout and added “and chancery” preceding “court clerks.”

Laws 2019, ch. 200 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Wyo. Const. art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2019.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Cited

in

Van Riper v. Odekoven, 2001 WY 58, 26 P.3d 325,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 2001).

§ 5-2-121.
Indigent
civil legal services account created; purposes.

There is created the indigent civil legal services account to be administered by the supreme court. The account shall receive all funds paid to the state treasurer from the fees imposed to support indigent civil legal services, pursuant to W.S.

2-2-401

,

5-2-202

,

5-3-205

,

5-3-206

,

5-6-108

,

5-6-204

,

5-6-303

,

5-9-135

,

5-9-144

,

6-10-102

and

6-10-103

. Funds within the account shall be used by the supreme court for the establishment and operation of a statewide program to provide civil legal services to indigent individuals within the state. Interest accruing to this account shall be retained in the account and shall be expended for the purposes provided in this section. No funds shall be expended from the account until the legislature appropriates the funds.

For the fiscal biennium commencing July 1, 2012 and each fiscal biennium thereafter, the supreme court shall include in its proposed budget a biennial budget and plan for the account. Each biennial plan and proposed budget shall be submitted to the joint appropriations interim committee and the joint judiciary interim committee. Each biennial plan submitted under this subsection beginning with the biennium commencing July 1, 2012 shall include case statistics and program costs for the preceding biennium. The joint judiciary interim committee may submit any comments it deems appropriate to the joint appropriations interim committee.

The supreme court shall provide for the conduct of audits of the account on a biennial basis beginning July 1, 2011. The audits shall be available for public review.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 109, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2010, ch. 109, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

Applied in

Chapman v. State, 2013 WY 57,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(May 10, 2013).

§ 5-2-122.
Indigent
civil legal services program created; purposes.

An indigent civil legal services program is created to be operated in accordance with the following:

The supreme court shall develop a comprehensive plan for funding a statewide program of civil legal services to the indigent from the account. By November 1, 2010 and again by May 1, 2011, the court shall submit to the joint appropriations interim committee and the joint judiciary interim committee reports on the plan of operation for the program;

The supreme court may operate the program directly, or contract with a nonprofit organization to operate the program;

The court shall adopt rules and regulations for the program prior to implementation subject to the following:

In adopting rules and regulations governing the program the court shall set the following priorities, which are not intended to be exclusive, but to provide direction on the management and operation of the program:

Cases in which an indigent individual is a defendant in a lawsuit;

Cases in which an indigent individual is seeking to enforce a court order;

Cases involving domestic relations and family law;

Matters involving general legal advice to indigent individuals.

In adopting rules and regulations governing the program, the court shall prohibit the program from providing legal representation in the following areas:

Cases seeking tort damages;

Criminal defense;

Cases against public agencies or political subdivisions seeking to change or overturn existing rules, regulations and policies. This prohibition shall not limit the program’s ability to represent indigent individuals who are seeking benefits that may be owed them by public entities.

The rules shall establish eligibility standards for the receipt of services. The eligibility standards shall require that civil legal services be funded from the account only for individuals whose total household income does not exceed two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty level;

The program shall be operated in coordination with other publicly or privately funded programs providing civil legal services to the indigent with a goal of developing an integrated system for the delivery of indigent civil legal services on a statewide basis by July 1, 2011;

The program shall be coordinated with the Wyoming state bar and other entities on private attorney involvement, pro bono civil legal services and educational programs;

For funding under the program, the program shall establish a statewide single point of entry for indigent civil legal services or establish other operations that allow for simplified and easily available access to the program;

The program may grant funds to existing eligible programs to assist in providing civil legal services and may be used to enhance the civil legal services that the existing programs are providing;

The program may receive grants and donations which shall be deposited to the account;

The program shall establish uniform standards for the delivery of civil legal services and operate programmatic and fiscal management programs to ensure accountability for all funds.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 109, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2010, ch. 109, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

Editor's Notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Applied in

Chapman v. State, 2013 WY 57,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(May 10, 2013).

§ 5-2-123.
Supreme court budget submittal.

The supreme court shall submit standard and supplemental budget requests to the legislature not later than November 1 of the year preceding the fiscal year in which the standard or supplemental budget is to take effect. Subject to W.S.

9-2-1003

.1(d), the supreme court shall prepare all personal services budget requests using the same methods and practices as the executive branch.

History.

2017 ch. 16, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

added "Subject to W.S.

9-2-1003

.1(d)," at the beginning of the second sentence and made a related change.

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 16, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.